Washington statutes.
RCW 18.130.085

Communication with complainant.

If the department communicates in writing to a complainant, or his or her representative, regarding his or her complaint, such communication shall not include the address or telephone number of the health care provider against whom he or she has complained. The department shall inform all applicants for a health care provider license of the provisions of this section and chapter 42.56 RCW regarding the release of address and telephone information.

[ 2005 c 274 s 230; 1993 c 360 s 1.]

NOTES:

Effective date—1993 c 360: "This act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and shall take effect immediately [May 15, 1993]." [ 1993 c 360 s 3.]